Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE L. COURT PROFESSIONS REGULATION

CHAPTER 158. COURT SECURITY OFFICERS

Sec. 158.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "court security officer" means a constable, sheriff, sheriff's deputy, municipal peace officer, or any other person assigned to provide security for an appellate, district, statutory county, county, municipal, or justice court in this state.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 190 (S.B. 42), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 158.002. COURT SECURITY CERTIFICATION. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a person may not serve as a court security officer for an appellate, district, statutory county, county, municipal, or justice court in this state unless the person holds a court security certification issued by a training program approved by the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement.

(b) A court security officer is not required to hold a court security certification to provide security to a court described by Subsection (a) before the first anniversary of the date the officer begins providing security for the court.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 190 (S.B. 42), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 158.003. VERIFICATION. The sheriff, constable, law enforcement agency, or other entity that provides security for a court shall verify that each court security officer holds the court security certification as required by this chapter.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 190 (S.B. 42), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2017.